Illinois, session 104th, HB5163.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-106.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-106.1)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-256)8    Sec. 6-106.1. School bus driver permit. 9    (a) The Secretary of State shall issue a school bus driver 10permit for the operation of first or second division vehicles 11being operated as school buses or a permit valid only for the 12operation of first division vehicles being operated as school 13buses to those applicants who have met all the requirements of 14the application and screening process under this Section to 15insure the welfare and safety of children who are transported 16on school buses throughout the State of Illinois. Applicants 17shall obtain the proper application required by the Secretary 18of State from their prospective or current employer and submit 19the completed application to the prospective or current 20employer along with the necessary fingerprint submission as 21required by the Illinois State Police to conduct 22fingerprint-based criminal background checks on current and 23future information available in the State system and current   HB5163 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1information available through the Federal Bureau of 2Investigation's system. Applicants who have completed the 3fingerprinting requirements shall not be subjected to the 4fingerprinting process when applying for subsequent permits or 5submitting proof of successful completion of the annual 6refresher course. Individuals who on July 1, 1995 (the 7effective date of Public Act 88-612) possess a valid school 8bus driver permit that has been previously issued by the 9appropriate Regional School Superintendent are not subject to 10the fingerprinting provisions of this Section as long as the 11permit remains valid and does not lapse. The applicant shall 12be required to pay all related application and fingerprinting 13fees as established by rule, including, but not limited to, 14the amounts established by the Illinois State Police and the 15Federal Bureau of Investigation to process fingerprint-based 16criminal background investigations. All fees paid for 17fingerprint processing services under this Section shall be 18deposited into the State Police Services Fund for the cost 19incurred in processing the fingerprint-based criminal 20background investigations. All other fees paid under this 21Section shall be deposited into the Road Fund for the purpose 22of defraying the costs of the Secretary of State in 23administering this Section. All applicants must: 24        1. be 21 years of age or older; 25        2. possess a valid and properly classified driver's 26    license issued by the Secretary of State;   HB5163 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1        3. possess a valid driver's license, which has not 2    been revoked, suspended, or canceled for 3 years 3    immediately prior to the date of application, or have not 4    had his or her commercial motor vehicle driving privileges 5    disqualified within the 3 years immediately prior to the 6    date of application; 7        4. unless the applicant holds a valid commercial 8    driver's license or a commercial driver's license that 9    expired in the preceding 30 days issued by another state 10    with a school bus and passenger endorsement, successfully 11    pass a first division or second division written test, 12    administered by the Secretary of State, on school bus 13    operation, school bus safety, and special traffic laws 14    relating to school buses and submit to a review of the 15    applicant's driving habits by the Secretary of State at 16    the time the written test is given. For purposes of this 17    paragraph, "state" means a state of the United States and 18    the District of Columbia; 19        5. demonstrate ability to exercise reasonable care in 20    the operation of school buses in accordance with rules 21    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 22        6. demonstrate physical fitness to operate school 23    buses by submitting the results of a medical examination, 24    including tests for drug use for each applicant not 25    subject to such testing pursuant to federal law, conducted 26    by a licensed physician, a licensed advanced practice   HB5163 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    registered nurse, or a licensed physician assistant within 2    90 days of the date of application according to standards 3    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 4        7. affirm under penalties of perjury that he or she 5    has not made a false statement or knowingly concealed a 6    material fact in any application for permit; 7        8. have completed an initial classroom course, 8    including first aid procedures, in school bus driver 9    safety as promulgated by the Secretary of State and, after 10    satisfactory completion of said initial course, an annual 11    refresher course; such courses and the agency or 12    organization conducting such courses shall be approved by 13    the Secretary of State; failure to complete the annual 14    refresher course shall result in cancellation of the 15    permit until such course is completed; 16        9. not have been under an order of court supervision 17    for or convicted of 2 or more serious traffic offenses, as 18    defined by rule, within one year prior to the date of 19    application that may endanger the life or safety of any of 20    the driver's passengers within the duration of the permit 21    period; 22        10. not have been under an order of court supervision 23    for or convicted of reckless driving, aggravated reckless 24    driving, driving while under the influence of alcohol, 25    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or 26    any combination thereof, or reckless homicide resulting   HB5163 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    from the operation of a motor vehicle within 3 years of the 2    date of application; 3        11. not have been convicted of committing or 4    attempting to commit any one or more of the following 5    offenses: (i) those offenses defined in Sections 8-1, 6    8-1.2, 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 9-3, 9-3.2, 9-3.3, 10-1, 7    10-2, 10-3.1, 10-4, 10-5, 10-5.1, 10-6, 10-7, 10-9, 8    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-6.5, 9    11-6.6, 11-9, 11-9.1, 11-9.1A, 11-9.3, 11-9.4, 11-9.4-1, 10    11-14, 11-14.1, 11-14.3, 11-14.4, 11-15, 11-15.1, 11-16, 11    11-17, 11-17.1, 11-18, 11-18.1, 11-19, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 12    11-20, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, 11-20.4, 11-21, 11-22, 13    11-23, 11-24, 11-25, 11-26, 11-30, 12-2.6, 12-3.05, 14    12-3.1, 12-3.3, 12-4, 12-4.1, 12-4.2, 12-4.2-5, 12-4.3, 15    12-4.4, 12-4.5, 12-4.6, 12-4.7, 12-4.9, 12-5.3, 12-6, 16    12-6.2, 12-7.1, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 12-7.5, 12-11, 12-13, 17    12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, 12-16, 12-21.5, 12-21.6, 12-33, 18    12C-5, 12C-10, 12C-20, 12C-30, 12C-45, 16-16, 16-16.1, 19    18-1, 18-2, 18-3, 18-4, 18-5, 19-6, 20-1, 20-1.1, 20-1.2, 20    20-1.3, 20-2, 24-1, 24-1.1, 24-1.2, 24-1.2-5, 24-1.6, 21    24-1.7, 24-2.1, 24-3.3, 24-3.5, 24-3.8, 24-3.9, 31A-1.1, 22    33A-2, and 33D-1, in subsection (A), clauses (a) and (b), 23    of Section 24-3, and those offenses contained in Article 24    29D of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 25    2012; (ii) those offenses defined in the Cannabis Control 26    Act except those offenses defined in subsections (a) and   HB5163 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    (b) of Section 4, and subsection (a) of Section 5 of the 2    Cannabis Control Act; (iii) those offenses defined in the 3    Illinois Controlled Substances Act; (iv) those offenses 4    defined in the Methamphetamine Control and Community 5    Protection Act; (v) any offense committed or attempted in 6    any other state or against the laws of the United States, 7    which if committed or attempted in this State would be 8    punishable as one or more of the foregoing offenses; (vi) 9    the offenses defined in Section 4.1 and 5.1 of the Wrongs 10    to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the Criminal Code of 11    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; (vii) those offenses 12    defined in Section 6-16 of the Liquor Control Act of 1934; 13    and (viii) those offenses defined in the Methamphetamine 14    Precursor Control Act;15        12. not have been repeatedly involved as a driver in 16    motor vehicle collisions or been repeatedly convicted of 17    offenses against laws and ordinances regulating the 18    movement of traffic, to a degree which indicates lack of 19    ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care in the 20    safe operation of a motor vehicle or disrespect for the 21    traffic laws and the safety of other persons upon the 22    highway; 23        13. not have, through the unlawful operation of a 24    motor vehicle, caused a crash resulting in the death of 25    any person; 26        14. not have, within the last 5 years, been adjudged   HB5163 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    to be afflicted with or suffering from any mental 2    disability or disease; 3        15. consent, in writing, to the release of results of 4    reasonable suspicion drug and alcohol testing under 5    Section 6-106.1c of this Code by the employer of the 6    applicant to the Secretary of State; and7        16. not have been convicted of committing or 8    attempting to commit within the last 20 years: (i) an 9    offense defined in subsection (c) of Section 4, subsection 10    (b) of Section 5, and subsection (a) of Section 8 of the 11    Cannabis Control Act; or (ii) any offenses in any other 12    state or against the laws of the United States that, if 13    committed or attempted in this State, would be punishable 14    as one or more of the foregoing offenses. 15    (a-5) If an applicant's driver's license has been 16suspended within the 3 years immediately prior to the date of 17application for the sole reason of failure to pay child 18support, that suspension shall not bar the applicant from 19receiving a school bus driver permit. 20    (a-10) By January 1, 2024, the Secretary of State, in 21conjunction with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall 22develop a separate classroom course and refresher course for 23operation of vehicles of the first division being operated as 24school buses. Regional superintendents of schools, working 25with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall offer the 26course virtually by January 1, 2027.   HB5163 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    (a-15) By January 1, 2027, the Secretary of State shall 2make the written test for the operation of vehicles of the 3first division being operated as school buses available for 4completion online. 5    (b) A school bus driver permit shall be valid for a period 6specified by the Secretary of State as set forth by rule. It 7shall be renewable upon compliance with subsection (a) of this 8Section. 9    (c) A school bus driver permit shall contain the holder's 10driver's license number, legal name, residence address, zip 11code, and date of birth, a brief description of the holder, and 12a space for signature. The Secretary of State may require a 13suitable photograph of the holder. 14    (d) The employer shall be responsible for conducting a 15pre-employment interview with prospective school bus driver 16candidates, distributing school bus driver applications and 17medical forms to be completed by the applicant, and submitting 18the applicant's fingerprint cards to the Illinois State Police 19that are required for the criminal background investigations. 20The employer shall certify in writing to the Secretary of 21State that all pre-employment conditions have been 22successfully completed including the successful completion of 23an Illinois specific criminal background investigation through 24the Illinois State Police and the submission of necessary 25fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 26criminal history information available through the Federal   HB5163 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1Bureau of Investigation system. The applicant shall present 2the certification to the Secretary of State at the time of 3submitting the school bus driver permit application. 4    (e) Permits shall initially be provisional upon receiving 5certification from the employer that all pre-employment 6conditions have been successfully completed, and upon 7successful completion of all training and examination 8requirements for the classification of the vehicle to be 9operated, the Secretary of State shall provisionally issue a 10School Bus Driver Permit. The permit shall remain in a 11provisional status pending the completion of the Federal 12Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation 13based upon fingerprinting specimens submitted to the Federal 14Bureau of Investigation by the Illinois State Police. The 15Federal Bureau of Investigation shall report the findings 16directly to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State 17shall remove the bus driver permit from provisional status 18upon the applicant's successful completion of the Federal 19Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation. 20    (f) A school bus driver permit holder shall notify the 21employer and the Secretary of State if he or she is issued an 22order of court supervision for or convicted in another state 23of an offense that would make him or her ineligible for a 24permit under subsection (a) of this Section. The written 25notification shall be made within 5 days of the entry of the 26order of court supervision or conviction. Failure of the   HB5163 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1permit holder to provide the notification is punishable as a 2petty offense for a first violation and a Class B misdemeanor 3for a second or subsequent violation. 4    (g) Cancellation; suspension; notice and procedure. 5        (1) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 6    driver permit of an applicant whose criminal background 7    investigation discloses that he or she is not in 8    compliance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this 9    Section. 10        (2) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 11    driver permit when he or she receives notice that the 12    permit holder fails to comply with any provision of this 13    Section or any rule promulgated for the administration of 14    this Section. 15        (3) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 16    driver permit if the permit holder's restricted commercial 17    or commercial driving privileges are withdrawn or 18    otherwise invalidated. 19        (4) The Secretary of State may not issue a school bus 20    driver permit for a period of 3 years to an applicant who 21    fails to obtain a negative result on a drug test as 22    required in item 6 of subsection (a) of this Section or 23    under federal law. 24        (5) The Secretary of State shall forthwith suspend a 25    school bus driver permit for a period of 3 years upon 26    receiving notice that the holder has failed to obtain a   HB5163 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    negative result on a drug test as required in item 6 of 2    subsection (a) of this Section or under federal law. 3        (6) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 4    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving 5    notice from the employer that the holder failed to perform 6    the inspection procedure set forth in subsection (a) or 7    (b) of Section 12-816 of this Code. 8        (7) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 9    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving 10    notice from the employer that the holder refused to submit 11    to an alcohol or drug test as required by Section 6-106.1c 12    or has submitted to a test required by that Section which 13    disclosed an alcohol concentration of more than 0.00 or 14    disclosed a positive result on a National Institute on 15    Drug Abuse five-drug panel, utilizing federal standards 16    set forth in 49 CFR 40.87. 17    The Secretary of State shall notify the State 18Superintendent of Education and the permit holder's 19prospective or current employer that the applicant (1) has 20failed a criminal background investigation or (2) is no longer 21eligible for a school bus driver permit; and of the related 22cancellation of the applicant's provisional school bus driver 23permit. The cancellation shall remain in effect pending the 24outcome of a hearing pursuant to Section 2-118 of this Code. 25The scope of the hearing shall be limited to the issuance 26criteria contained in subsection (a) of this Section. A   HB5163 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1petition requesting a hearing shall be submitted to the 2Secretary of State and shall contain the reason the individual 3feels he or she is entitled to a school bus driver permit. The 4permit holder's employer shall notify in writing to the 5Secretary of State that the employer has certified the removal 6of the offending school bus driver from service prior to the 7start of that school bus driver's next work shift. An 8employing school board that fails to remove the offending 9school bus driver from service is subject to the penalties 10defined in Section 3-14.23 of the School Code. A school bus 11contractor who violates a provision of this Section is subject 12to the penalties defined in Section 6-106.11. 13    All valid school bus driver permits issued under this 14Section prior to January 1, 1995, shall remain effective until 15their expiration date unless otherwise invalidated. 16    (h) When a school bus driver permit holder who is a service 17member is called to active duty, the employer of the permit 18holder shall notify the Secretary of State, within 30 days of 19notification from the permit holder, that the permit holder 20has been called to active duty. Upon notification pursuant to 21this subsection, (i) the Secretary of State shall characterize 22the permit as inactive until a permit holder renews the permit 23as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, and (ii) if a 24permit holder fails to comply with the requirements of this 25Section while called to active duty, the Secretary of State 26shall not characterize the permit as invalid.   HB5163 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    (i) A school bus driver permit holder who is a service 2member returning from active duty must, within 90 days, renew 3a permit characterized as inactive pursuant to subsection (h) 4of this Section by complying with the renewal requirements of 5subsection (b) of this Section. 6    (j) For purposes of subsections (h) and (i) of this 7Section: 8    "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive 9order of the President of the United States, an act of the 10Congress of the United States, or an order of the Governor. 11    "Service member" means a member of the Armed Services or 12reserve forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 13National Guard. 14    (k) A private carrier employer of a school bus driver 15permit holder, having satisfied the employer requirements of 16this Section, shall be held to a standard of ordinary care for 17intentional acts committed in the course of employment by the 18bus driver permit holder. This subsection (k) shall in no way 19limit the liability of the private carrier employer for 20violation of any provision of this Section or for the 21negligent hiring or retention of a school bus driver permit 22holder. 23(Source: P.A. 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; 24104-260, eff. 8-15-25.) 25    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-256)  HB5163 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    Sec. 6-106.1. School bus driver permit. 2    (a) The Secretary of State shall issue a school bus driver 3permit for the operation of first or second division vehicles 4being operated as school buses, a permit valid only for the 5operation of first division vehicles being operated as school 6buses, or a school bus permit with a restriction valid for the 7operation of a first division vehicle being operated as a 8school bus or a multifunction school activity bus designed to 9carry up to 15 passengers, including the driver, when being 10used for curriculum-related activities as set forth in Section 1111-1414.1 of this Code, to those applicants who have met all 12the requirements of the application and screening process 13under this Section to insure the welfare and safety of 14children who are transported on school buses throughout the 15State of Illinois. Applicants shall obtain the proper 16application required by the Secretary of State from their 17prospective or current employer and submit the completed 18application to the prospective or current employer along with 19the necessary fingerprint submission as required by the 20Illinois State Police to conduct fingerprint-based criminal 21background checks on current and future information available 22in the State system and current information available through 23the Federal Bureau of Investigation's system. Applicants who 24have completed the fingerprinting requirements shall not be 25subjected to the fingerprinting process when applying for 26subsequent permits or submitting proof of successful   HB5163 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1completion of the annual refresher course. Individuals who on 2July 1, 1995 (the effective date of Public Act 88-612) possess 3a valid school bus driver permit that has been previously 4issued by the appropriate Regional School Superintendent are 5not subject to the fingerprinting provisions of this Section 6as long as the permit remains valid and does not lapse. The 7applicant shall be required to pay all related application and 8fingerprinting fees as established by rule, including, but not 9limited to, the amounts established by the Illinois State 10Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to process 11fingerprint-based criminal background investigations. All fees 12paid for fingerprint processing services under this Section 13shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund for the 14cost incurred in processing the fingerprint-based criminal 15background investigations. All other fees paid under this 16Section shall be deposited into the Road Fund for the purpose 17of defraying the costs of the Secretary of State in 18administering this Section. All applicants must: 19        1. be 21 years of age or older; 20        2. possess a valid and properly classified driver's 21    license issued by the Secretary of State; 22        3. possess a valid driver's license, which has not 23    been revoked, suspended, or canceled for 3 years 24    immediately prior to the date of application, or have not 25    had his or her commercial motor vehicle driving privileges 26    disqualified within the 3 years immediately prior to the   HB5163 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    date of application; 2        4. unless the applicant holds a valid commercial 3    driver's license or a commercial driver's license that 4    expired in the preceding 30 days issued by another state 5    with a school bus and passenger endorsement, successfully 6    pass a first division or second division written test, 7    administered by the Secretary of State, on school bus 8    operation, school bus safety, and special traffic laws 9    relating to school buses and submit to a review of the 10    applicant's driving habits by the Secretary of State at 11    the time the written test is given. For purposes of this 12    paragraph, "state" means a state of the United States and 13    the District of Columbia; 14        5. demonstrate ability to exercise reasonable care in 15    the operation of school buses in accordance with rules 16    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 17        6. demonstrate physical fitness to operate school 18    buses by submitting the results of a medical examination, 19    including tests for drug use for each applicant not 20    subject to such testing pursuant to federal law, conducted 21    by a licensed physician, a licensed advanced practice 22    registered nurse, or a licensed physician assistant within 23    90 days of the date of application according to standards 24    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 25        7. affirm under penalties of perjury that he or she 26    has not made a false statement or knowingly concealed a   HB5163 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    material fact in any application for permit; 2        8. have completed an initial classroom course, 3    including first aid procedures, in school bus driver 4    safety as promulgated by the Secretary of State and, after 5    satisfactory completion of said initial course, an annual 6    refresher course; such courses and the agency or 7    organization conducting such courses shall be approved by 8    the Secretary of State; failure to complete the annual 9    refresher course shall result in cancellation of the 10    permit until such course is completed; 11        9. not have been under an order of court supervision 12    for or convicted of 2 or more serious traffic offenses, as 13    defined by rule, within one year prior to the date of 14    application that may endanger the life or safety of any of 15    the driver's passengers within the duration of the permit 16    period; 17        10. not have been under an order of court supervision 18    for or convicted of reckless driving, aggravated reckless 19    driving, driving while under the influence of alcohol, 20    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or 21    any combination thereof, or reckless homicide resulting 22    from the operation of a motor vehicle within 3 years of the 23    date of application; 24        11. not have been convicted of committing or 25    attempting to commit any one or more of the following 26    offenses: (i) those offenses defined in Sections 8-1,   HB5163 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    8-1.2, 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 9-3, 9-3.2, 9-3.3, 10-1, 2    10-2, 10-3.1, 10-4, 10-5, 10-5.1, 10-6, 10-7, 10-9, 3    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-6.5, 4    11-6.6, 11-9, 11-9.1, 11-9.1A, 11-9.3, 11-9.4, 11-9.4-1, 5    11-14, 11-14.1, 11-14.3, 11-14.4, 11-15, 11-15.1, 11-16, 6    11-17, 11-17.1, 11-18, 11-18.1, 11-19, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 7    11-20, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, 11-20.4, 11-21, 11-22, 8    11-23, 11-24, 11-25, 11-26, 11-30, 12-2.6, 12-3.05, 9    12-3.1, 12-3.3, 12-4, 12-4.1, 12-4.2, 12-4.2-5, 12-4.3, 10    12-4.4, 12-4.5, 12-4.6, 12-4.7, 12-4.9, 12-5.3, 12-6, 11    12-6.2, 12-7.1, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 12-7.5, 12-11, 12-13, 12    12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, 12-16, 12-21.5, 12-21.6, 12-33, 13    12C-5, 12C-10, 12C-20, 12C-30, 12C-45, 16-16, 16-16.1, 14    18-1, 18-2, 18-3, 18-4, 18-5, 19-6, 20-1, 20-1.1, 20-1.2, 15    20-1.3, 20-2, 24-1, 24-1.1, 24-1.2, 24-1.2-5, 24-1.6, 16    24-1.7, 24-2.1, 24-3.3, 24-3.5, 24-3.8, 24-3.9, 31A-1.1, 17    33A-2, and 33D-1, in subsection (A), clauses (a) and (b), 18    of Section 24-3, and those offenses contained in Article 19    29D of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 20    2012; (ii) those offenses defined in the Cannabis Control 21    Act except those offenses defined in subsections (a) and 22    (b) of Section 4, and subsection (a) of Section 5 of the 23    Cannabis Control Act; (iii) those offenses defined in the 24    Illinois Controlled Substances Act; (iv) those offenses 25    defined in the Methamphetamine Control and Community 26    Protection Act; (v) any offense committed or attempted in   HB5163 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    any other state or against the laws of the United States, 2    which if committed or attempted in this State would be 3    punishable as one or more of the foregoing offenses; (vi) 4    the offenses defined in Section 4.1 and 5.1 of the Wrongs 5    to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the Criminal Code of 6    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; (vii) those offenses 7    defined in Section 6-16 of the Liquor Control Act of 1934; 8    and (viii) those offenses defined in the Methamphetamine 9    Precursor Control Act;10        12. not have been repeatedly involved as a driver in 11    motor vehicle collisions or been repeatedly convicted of 12    offenses against laws and ordinances regulating the 13    movement of traffic, to a degree which indicates lack of 14    ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care in the 15    safe operation of a motor vehicle or disrespect for the 16    traffic laws and the safety of other persons upon the 17    highway; 18        13. not have, through the unlawful operation of a 19    motor vehicle, caused a crash resulting in the death of 20    any person; 21        14. not have, within the last 5 years, been adjudged 22    to be afflicted with or suffering from any mental 23    disability or disease; 24        15. consent, in writing, to the release of results of 25    reasonable suspicion drug and alcohol testing under 26    Section 6-106.1c of this Code by the employer of the   HB5163 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    applicant to the Secretary of State; and2        16. not have been convicted of committing or 3    attempting to commit within the last 20 years: (i) an 4    offense defined in subsection (c) of Section 4, subsection 5    (b) of Section 5, and subsection (a) of Section 8 of the 6    Cannabis Control Act; or (ii) any offenses in any other 7    state or against the laws of the United States that, if 8    committed or attempted in this State, would be punishable 9    as one or more of the foregoing offenses. 10    (a-5) If an applicant's driver's license has been 11suspended within the 3 years immediately prior to the date of 12application for the sole reason of failure to pay child 13support, that suspension shall not bar the applicant from 14receiving a school bus driver permit. 15    (a-10) By January 1, 2024, the Secretary of State, in 16conjunction with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall 17develop a separate classroom course and refresher course for 18operation of vehicles of the first division being operated as 19school buses. Regional superintendents of schools, working 20with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall offer the 21course virtually by January 1, 2027. 22    (a-15) By January 1, 2027, the Secretary of State shall 23make the written test for the operation of vehicles of the 24first division being operated as school buses available for 25completion online. 26    (b) A school bus driver permit shall be valid for a period   HB5163 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1specified by the Secretary of State as set forth by rule. It 2shall be renewable upon compliance with subsection (a) of this 3Section. 4    (c) A school bus driver permit shall contain the holder's 5driver's license number, legal name, residence address, zip 6code, and date of birth, a brief description of the holder, and 7a space for signature. The Secretary of State may require a 8suitable photograph of the holder. 9    (d) The employer shall be responsible for conducting a 10pre-employment interview with prospective school bus driver 11candidates, distributing school bus driver applications and 12medical forms to be completed by the applicant, and submitting 13the applicant's fingerprint cards to the Illinois State Police 14that are required for the criminal background investigations. 15The employer shall certify in writing to the Secretary of 16State that all pre-employment conditions have been 17successfully completed including the successful completion of 18an Illinois specific criminal background investigation through 19the Illinois State Police and the submission of necessary 20fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 21criminal history information available through the Federal 22Bureau of Investigation system. The applicant shall present 23the certification to the Secretary of State at the time of 24submitting the school bus driver permit application. 25    (e) Permits shall initially be provisional upon receiving 26certification from the employer that all pre-employment   HB5163 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1conditions have been successfully completed, and upon 2successful completion of all training and examination 3requirements for the classification of the vehicle to be 4operated, the Secretary of State shall provisionally issue a 5School Bus Driver Permit. The permit shall remain in a 6provisional status pending the completion of the Federal 7Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation 8based upon fingerprinting specimens submitted to the Federal 9Bureau of Investigation by the Illinois State Police. The 10Federal Bureau of Investigation shall report the findings 11directly to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State 12shall remove the bus driver permit from provisional status 13upon the applicant's successful completion of the Federal 14Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation. 15    (f) A school bus driver permit holder shall notify the 16employer and the Secretary of State if he or she is issued an 17order of court supervision for or convicted in another state 18of an offense that would make him or her ineligible for a 19permit under subsection (a) of this Section. The written 20notification shall be made within 5 days of the entry of the 21order of court supervision or conviction. Failure of the 22permit holder to provide the notification is punishable as a 23petty offense for a first violation and a Class B misdemeanor 24for a second or subsequent violation. 25    (g) Cancellation; suspension; notice and procedure. 26        (1) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus   HB5163 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    driver permit of an applicant whose criminal background 2    investigation discloses that he or she is not in 3    compliance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this 4    Section. 5        (2) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 6    driver permit when he or she receives notice that the 7    permit holder fails to comply with any provision of this 8    Section or any rule promulgated for the administration of 9    this Section. 10        (3) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 11    driver permit if the permit holder's restricted commercial 12    or commercial driving privileges are withdrawn or 13    otherwise invalidated. 14        (4) The Secretary of State may not issue a school bus 15    driver permit for a period of 3 years to an applicant who 16    fails to obtain a negative result on a drug test as 17    required in item 6 of subsection (a) of this Section or 18    under federal law. 19        (5) The Secretary of State shall forthwith suspend a 20    school bus driver permit for a period of 3 years upon 21    receiving notice that the holder has failed to obtain a 22    negative result on a drug test as required in item 6 of 23    subsection (a) of this Section or under federal law. 24        (6) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 25    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving 26    notice from the employer that the holder failed to perform   HB5163 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    the inspection procedure set forth in subsection (a) or 2    (b) of Section 12-816 of this Code. 3        (7) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 4    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving 5    notice from the employer that the holder refused to submit 6    to an alcohol or drug test as required by Section 6-106.1c 7    or has submitted to a test required by that Section which 8    disclosed an alcohol concentration of more than 0.00 or 9    disclosed a positive result on a National Institute on 10    Drug Abuse five-drug panel, utilizing federal standards 11    set forth in 49 CFR 40.87. 12    The Secretary of State shall notify the State 13Superintendent of Education and the permit holder's 14prospective or current employer that the applicant (1) has 15failed a criminal background investigation or (2) is no longer 16eligible for a school bus driver permit; and of the related 17cancellation of the applicant's provisional school bus driver 18permit. The cancellation shall remain in effect pending the 19outcome of a hearing pursuant to Section 2-118 of this Code. 20The scope of the hearing shall be limited to the issuance 21criteria contained in subsection (a) of this Section. A 22petition requesting a hearing shall be submitted to the 23Secretary of State and shall contain the reason the individual 24feels he or she is entitled to a school bus driver permit. The 25permit holder's employer shall notify in writing to the 26Secretary of State that the employer has certified the removal   HB5163 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1of the offending school bus driver from service prior to the 2start of that school bus driver's next work shift. An 3employing school board that fails to remove the offending 4school bus driver from service is subject to the penalties 5defined in Section 3-14.23 of the School Code. A school bus 6contractor who violates a provision of this Section is subject 7to the penalties defined in Section 6-106.11. 8    All valid school bus driver permits issued under this 9Section prior to January 1, 1995, shall remain effective until 10their expiration date unless otherwise invalidated. 11    (h) When a school bus driver permit holder who is a service 12member is called to active duty, the employer of the permit 13holder shall notify the Secretary of State, within 30 days of 14notification from the permit holder, that the permit holder 15has been called to active duty. Upon notification pursuant to 16this subsection, (i) the Secretary of State shall characterize 17the permit as inactive until a permit holder renews the permit 18as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, and (ii) if a 19permit holder fails to comply with the requirements of this 20Section while called to active duty, the Secretary of State 21shall not characterize the permit as invalid. 22    (i) A school bus driver permit holder who is a service 23member returning from active duty must, within 90 days, renew 24a permit characterized as inactive pursuant to subsection (h) 25of this Section by complying with the renewal requirements of 26subsection (b) of this Section.   HB5163 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1    (j) For purposes of subsections (h) and (i) of this 2Section: 3    "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive 4order of the President of the United States, an act of the 5Congress of the United States, or an order of the Governor. 6    "Service member" means a member of the Armed Services or 7reserve forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 8National Guard. 9    (k) A private carrier employer of a school bus driver 10permit holder, having satisfied the employer requirements of 11this Section, shall be held to a standard of ordinary care for 12intentional acts committed in the course of employment by the 13bus driver permit holder. This subsection (k) shall in no way 14limit the liability of the private carrier employer for 15violation of any provision of this Section or for the 16negligent hiring or retention of a school bus driver permit 17holder. 18    (l) The Secretary may adopt rules to implement this 19Section. 20(Source: P.A. 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; 21104-256, eff. 7-1-26; 104-260, eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-12-25.) 22    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 23changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 24that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 25represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does   HB5163 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 18219 LNS 31658 b1not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 2made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 3Public Act. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.